Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-903
El-Hajj Malik El-Shabazz, Malcolm X Day.

May 19 of each year shall be recognized as El-Hajj Malik El-Shabazz, Malcolm X Day, and shall be set apart for holding suitable exercises in the schools of the state in recognition of the sacrifices of the late Nebraska Hall of Fame inductee El-Hajj Malik El-Shabazz, Malcolm X and his contributions to the betterment of society.

Laws 2024, LB1102, § 2.